tests/infixes.aff
# infixes (see manual)
NOSUGGES
# Arabic
PFX A Y 6
PFX A 0 .a .
PFX A 0 ..o .
PFX A 0 y .
PFX A 0 y.a .
PFX A 0 t..a .
PFX A 0 t .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 n.o.a .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C .a .o .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D ..k ..q .

SFX S Y 5
SFX S 0 p.a.un .
SFX S 0 a.in .
SFX S 0 e. .
SFX S 0 o. .
SFX S 0 u.. .

SFX K Y 1
SFX K 0 o.en .

SFX H Y 1
SFX H i. u.en .
