tests/infixes.good
sr
sar
ql
qal
yql
yqal
tl
tal
tqla
nqola
qalin
pqalun
qol
sroq
sreq
braek
surq
writ
wrioten
wruten
qod
rpkb
rpqb
nkotabyyy
